Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.160

Investment in office equipment and real property interests used in doing business.

An association may invest its funds in the acquisition of furniture, fixtures and office equipment convenient and necessary for the carrying on of its business.

An association may invest its funds in real property or leasehold interests therein for use in the transaction of its business.

[ 1982 c 3 s 47; 1945 c 235 s 73; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-192. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 11; 1933 c 183 s 56.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.